Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2725
License required; liability for money transmission for unlicensed or nonexempt person.

A person shall not engage in the business of money transmission on behalf of a person not licensed under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or not exempt from the act pursuant to section 8-2703. A person that engages in such business and provides money transmission to the same extent as if the unlicensed or nonexempt person were a licensee shall be jointly and severally liable with the unlicensed or nonexempt person.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 25;

Laws 2021, LB363, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 30.